Utah statutes.
54-7-18.   Preference of actions and proceedings on courts' calendars.
(1)  The courts of this state shall consider, hear, and determine all actions
and proceedings under this chapter, and all actions and proceedings to which
the commission or the state of Utah is a party, in which any question arises
under this title or under or concerning any order or decision of the
commission before considering, hearing, or determining all other civil causes
except election causes.
(2)  If the commission requests it, the courts shall grant the same preference
to the commission in any action or proceeding in which the commission is
allowed to intervene.
